Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Article 2. General Administrative Officers.

§ 44-8.
Governor as Commander in Chief.

The Governor shall be Commander in Chief of the armed forces of the Commonwealth, and shall have power to employ such forces to repel invasion, suppress insurrection, and enforce the execution of the laws.

History.

1930, p. 950; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(8); R. P. 1948, § 44-8; 1958, c. 393; 1964, c. 227.

Cross references.

For constitutional authority, see Va. Const., Art. V, § 7.

§ 44-9.
Commander in Chief to prescribe regulations.

The Commander in Chief shall have the power, and it shall be his duty, from time to time, to issue such orders and to prescribe such regulations relating to the organization of the armed forces of the Commonwealth as will cause the same at all times to conform to the federal requirements of the United States government relating thereto.

History.

1930, p. 950; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(9); R. P. 1948, § 44-9; 1958, c. 393.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell” in the Virginia National Guard. —

The Virginia General Assembly may or may not have the authority to mandate that the Virginia National Guard continue the “Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell” policy after its recent repeal by Congress, but the federal regulations governing the repeal have not yet been issued. The United States Constitution expressly reserves to the states the power to appoint officers to the state militias, including the National Guard. The power to determine which state guard officers are eligible for service in the overlapping National Guard of the United States, however, rests with Congress. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Bill Janis, Member, House of Delegates, 11-001, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (01/25/11).

Congress, through the spending power, can condition the use of federal funds on the States’ acceptance of the federal repeal of “Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell.” Should the General Assembly wish to avoid the conditions likely to be attached to these funds with respect to “Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell” and mandate that the policy continue in the Virginia National Guard, it can raise, equip and fund an independent Virginia militia entirely from state revenues. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Bill Janis, Member, House of Delegates, 11-001, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 6 (01/25/11).

§ 44-9.1.
Censorship of certain sermons prohibited.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of law, the religious content of sermons, homilies, preaching, religious messages, or other speeches within religious services made by chaplains of the Virginia National Guard while in Title 32 or State Active Duty status or of the Virginia Defense Force shall not be censored or restricted by any state government official or agency, so long as (i) the religious content offered is not in any way a precursor of, introduction to, or part of any official ceremony, gathering, or formation that is not part of the religious service; (ii) the content does not urge disobedience of lawful orders; and (iii) members of the National Guard or Defense Force are not required to attend the service or event where such content is delivered.

History.

2015, c. 283.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 283 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 44-10.
Divisions of military staff.

The military staff shall be divided into (a) the personal staff of the Governor and (b) the administrative staff.

The personal staff of the Governor shall be constituted as now prescribed by law.

The administrative staff shall be as is authorized by the Secretary of Defense of the United States and shall perform such duties as the commander in chief may direct.

History.

1930, p. 950; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(10); R. P. 1948, § 44-10; 1958, c. 393.

§ 44-11.
Department of Military Affairs; Adjutant General.

There is hereby created the Department of Military Affairs to which is transferred all of the functions, powers and duties of the former Division of Military Affairs.

The Governor shall appoint an Adjutant General with the rank of brigadier general, major general or lieutenant general as the Governor may prescribe, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly if in session, and if not in session, then at its next succeeding session. The Adjutant General shall not hold the rank of lieutenant general unless such rank is federally recognized. The Adjutant General shall be in direct charge of the Department of Military Affairs and shall be responsible to the Governor and commander in chief for the proper performance of his duties. All the powers conferred and the duties imposed by law upon the Adjutant General shall be exercised or performed by him under the direction and control of the Governor. The Adjutant General shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor for a term coincident with that of the Governor. No person shall be appointed Adjutant General who shall not have had at least ten years’ commissioned service in the Virginia National Guard in at least field grade. The Adjutant General, while serving as such, may be a member of the Virginia National Guard.

The Adjutant General shall receive a salary prescribed by law.

History.

1927, p. 106; 1930, p. 951; Michie Code 1942, §§ 585(62), 2673(12); 1948, p. 48; R. P. 1948, § 44-11; 1964, c. 227.

§ 44-11.1.
Duties of the Department of Military Affairs.

The Department of Military Affairs shall support the objectives of the Governor and federal authorities by:

Administering and employing the Virginia Militia, as set forth in § 44-1;

Integrating into state operations all supporting Department of Defense capabilities and those forces provided by supporting states in a Title 32 or State Active Duty status;

Providing for the safety of citizens of the Commonwealth by maintaining order and public safety and assisting in counter-drug efforts, in cooperation with Virginia State Police and local law-enforcement agencies;

Preparing and executing contingency plans to provide for a timely and capable response to chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, or explosive incidents;

Preparing and executing contingency plans necessary for the provision of homeland defense;

Ensuring the support to families of service members of the Virginia National Guard;

Administering a state at-risk program for youth; and

Recruiting a force sufficiently manned and trained to accomplish the above duties.

The Department of Military Affairs shall perform such other duties as may be designated by the Governor.

History.

2007, cc. 127, 728.

§ 44-12.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 12.

§ 44-13.
Powers of Adjutant General.

As head of the Department of Military Affairs, the Adjutant General shall have command of all of the militia of the Commonwealth, subject to the orders of the Governor as Commander in Chief, and shall distribute all orders from the Governor pertaining to the military service and shall perform all duties imposed upon him or that Department by this title in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

1927, p. 106; 1930, p. 951; Michie Code 1942, §§ 585(62), 2673(13); R. P. 1948, § 44-13; 1958, c. 393; 1989, c. 414.

§ 44-13.1.
Virginia National Guard Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Program established.

The Adjutant General is authorized to establish a Virginia National Guard Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Program (the MWR Program) to provide leisure, recreation, and lodging opportunities for Virginia National Guard members and their families, Virginia Defense Force members and their families, employees of the Department of Military Affairs and their families, and other users of Department facilities as authorized by the Adjutant General.

History.

2016, c. 622.

§ 44-13.2.
Administration of the MWR Program.

The Adjutant General may authorize the MWR Program to (i) contract for goods and services; (ii) hire employees; and (iii) receive funds from patrons in exchange for goods or services provided within the MWR Program. The Adjutant General is authorized to establish MWR Program facilities throughout the Commonwealth that, in the Adjutant General’s judgment, are necessary for military purposes. The Adjutant General shall promulgate regulations to govern the operation of the MWR Program. The Adjutant General may appoint a director for the MWR Program. The Adjutant General shall establish a system of bookkeeping, accounting, and auditing procedures for the proper handling of funds derived from the MWR Program’s operations.

History.

2016, c. 622.

§ 44-13.3.
Virginia National Guard MWR Fund.

There is created within the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia National Guard MWR Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All (i) proceeds collected under the MWR Program and (ii) donations made to the Virginia National Guard MWR Program shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys from the Fund shall be used for the enhancement of morale, welfare, and recreation and the administration of the MWR Program, including paying the costs of (a) salaries of MWR Program employees; (b) public liability insurance, when needed; (c) infrastructure improvements on military property used in support of the MWR Program; and (d) any other expenses considered necessary in furtherance of the MWR Program by the Adjutant General. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Adjutant General.

History.

2016, c. 622.

§ 44-13.4.
Risk management.

The MWR Program shall be eligible to participate in the state risk management pool. The MWR Program shall procure separate insurance policies to cover liability associated with activities and operations not otherwise covered in the state risk management pool or by the Division of Risk Management.

History.

2016, c. 622.

§ 44-14.
Expenditures for Department.

All payments and disbursements payable out of the appropriation to the Department of Military Affairs shall be made by the State Treasurer upon warrants of the Comptroller issued upon vouchers signed by the Adjutant General or such person as the Adjutant General may designate for such purpose. Expenditures not specifically provided for but manifestly for the benefit of the military service may be made by the Adjutant General with the written approval of the Governor.

History.

1930, p. 950; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(11); 1944, p. 24; R. P. 1948, § 44-13; 2004, c. 12.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 12 deleted “concurrence of the Board of Military Affairs and the” preceding “written approval” in the last sentence.

§ 44-15.
Reports to Secretary of Defense.

The Adjutant General shall make such returns and reports to the Secretary of Defense, or to such officers as he may designate, at such times and in such form as may from time to time be prescribed.

History.

1930, p. 951; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(13); R. P. 1948, § 44-14; 1958, c. 393.

§ 44-16.
Records of Adjutant General.

The Adjutant General shall keep a record of all officers and enlisted personnel, and shall also keep all records and papers required by law or regulations to be filed therein.

History.

1930, p. 951; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(13); R. P. 1948, § 44-15; 1970, c. 662; 2011, cc. 572, 586.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and deleted “in his office” following “shall also keep.”

§ 44-17.
Regulations as to reports and care of property.

The Adjutant General is empowered to make such regulations pertaining to the preparation and rendering of reports and returns and to the care and preservation of public property as in his opinion the conditions demand, such regulations to be operative and in force when promulgated in the form of general orders, circulars, circular letters, or other regulations and documents.

History.

1930, p. 951; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(13); R. P. 1948, § 44-17; 1964, c. 227.

§ 44-18.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 221, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 44-18, Seal of Adjutant General, derived from 1930, p. 951; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(13); R. P. 1948, § 44-18.

§ 44-19.
Adjutant General to have charge of military property.

The Adjutant General shall have charge and care of all state military property and all United States military property issued to the Commonwealth of Virginia, and shall cause to be kept an accurate and careful account of all receipts and issues of the same. He shall require to be kept careful memoranda of all public military property on hand in the state arsenal or storehouses, and in the possession of the several organizations of the Virginia National Guard or issued to the Virginia Defense Force, and shall guard such property against injury and loss to the extent of his ability. He shall require every accountable and responsible officer of the National Guard to account for every deficiency in public military property in his possession immediately after such deficiency is discovered. The Adjutant General shall have the care and control of the state military reservation near Virginia Beach, and of such other real estate as the Commonwealth may acquire for military purposes, and it shall be the duty of the Adjutant General to provide for the proper care of such property and buildings thereon. For the maintenance, upkeep and improvement of the military reservation or reservations, the Adjutant General may expend from the appropriation to the Department of Military Affairs such amounts as may be necessary.

History.

1930, pp. 950, 952; Michie Code 1942, §§ 2673(11), 2673(13); 1944, p. 24; R. P. 1948, § 44-19; 1958, c. 393; 1989, c. 414; 2011, cc. 572, 586.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and deleted “State” preceding “Defense Force.”

§ 44-20.
Deputy Adjutant General (Army and Air) and Assistant Adjutant General (Army); assistants and clerical forces of Adjutant General.

The Adjutant General shall have a Deputy Adjutant General (Air), a Deputy Adjutant General (Army) and an Assistant Adjutant General (Army) whose grades shall not exceed that of brigadier general and he shall have other assistants and such clerical forces as may be necessary who shall serve at the pleasure of the Adjutant General, subject to the provisions of general law, and shall perform such duties as he may assign them. The Adjutant General shall have such other clerks and employees as may be necessary for the administration of his office.

History.

1930, p. 952; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(13); R.P. 1948, § 44-20; 1964, c. 227; 1979, c. 504; 1983, c. 74.

§ 44-21.
Bonds of Adjutant General and fiscal clerks.

The Adjutant General and his fiscal clerks shall be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

.

History.

1930, p. 952; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(13); R. P. 1948, § 44-21; 1964, c. 227; 2011, cc. 572, 586; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 152.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 572 and 586 are identical, and deleted the last sentence, which read: “The penalties of the bond shall be as follows: of the Adjutant General, $10,000, of each of his fiscal clerks, $3,000.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 152, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “be bonded in accordance with §

2.2-1840

” for “each give bond, with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the Governor, as provided by law for other state officers.”

§ 44-22.
Auditing accounts of Adjutant General.

The office and accounts of the Adjutant General pertaining to the Commonwealth of Virginia shall be audited by the direction of the Governor in the same manner as the office and accounts of other state officers are audited, as provided by law.

History.

1930, p. 952; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(13); R. P. 1948, § 44-22.

§ 44-23.
Repealed by Acts 1984, c. 734.

§ 44-24.
United States Property and Fiscal Officer.

The Governor shall appoint, designate or detail, subject to the approval of the Secretary of Defense, an officer of the National Guard of the Commonwealth to serve as a United States Property and Fiscal Officer. Any officer of the National Guard who has been so appointed and is serving as United States Property and Fiscal Officer, may be removed for just cause by the Governor with the approval of the Secretary of Defense. The Adjutant General is hereby declared ineligible to serve as United States Property and Fiscal Officer. The duties and remuneration of said United States Property and Fiscal Officer shall be such as are prescribed by existing or subsequently amended regulations of the armed forces of the United States.

History.

1930, p. 952; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(14); R. P. 1948, § 44-24; 1958, c. 393.

§ 44-24.1.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 221, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 44-24.1, Adjutant General may provide group health and hospitalization insurance for employees of Department, derived from 1966, c. 402.